Washington statutes.
RCW 23.100.0809

Alternative distribution of unclaimed property, distributions, redemptions, or payments.

A limited cooperative association may distribute unclaimed property, distributions, redemptions, or payments under chapter 23.86 RCW.

[ 2019 c 37 s 809.]